California, session 20252026, AB374.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide classified public school employees and classified community college district school employees with the same information guaranteed to private sector employees on their paychecks.SEC. 2. Section 45170 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 45169, to read:45170. (a) (1) Beginning with the 2026–27 school year, a public school employer, at the time of each payment of wages, shall furnish to a classified school employee an accurate itemized statement in writing showing all of the following:(A) Gross wages earned.(B) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the total hours worked by the employee.(C) All deductions, provided that all deductions made on written orders of the employee may be aggregated and shown as one item.(D) Net wages earned.(E) The inclusive dates of the period for which the employee is paid.(F) The name of the employee and only the last four digits of their social security number or an employee identification number other than a social security number.(G) The name and address of the public school employer.(H) All applicable hourly rates in effect during the payroll reporting period and the corresponding number of hours worked at each hourly rate by the employee, or the units of full-time equivalent.(I) (i) The total hours of paid and unpaid leave taken during the payroll reporting period and the applicable hourly rates for any paid leave taken.(ii) The leave time described in clause (i) may be reported separately on a supplemental itemized statement so long as it is provided at the same frequency as the statement of wages.(2) The deductions made from the payment of wages shall be recorded in ink or other indelible form, properly dated, showing the month, day, and year, and a copy of the statement and the record of the deductions shall be kept on file by the public school employer for at least three years at the public school employer or at a central location within the State of California.(3) The itemized statement shall be provided in at least one of the following formats:(A) As a detachable part of the check.(B) As a printed statement issued concurrently with direct deposit, provided it is readily accessible to a classified school employee.(C) As a digital statement made available through a secure employee portal that allows a classified school employee to view, download, and print current and past wage statements at no cost to the employee, provided it is readily accessible to the employee.(b) A public school employer that is required by this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section to keep the information required by subdivision (a) shall afford current and former classified school employees the right to inspect or receive a copy of records pertaining to their employment, upon reasonable request to the public school employer. The public school employer may take reasonable steps to ensure the identity of a current or former classified school employee. If the public school employer provides copies of the records, the actual cost of reproduction may be charged to the current or former classified school employee.(c) A public school employer who receives a written or oral request to inspect or receive a copy of records pursuant to subdivision (b) pertaining to a current or former classified school employee shall comply with the request as soon as practicable, but no later than 21 calendar days from the date of the request. Impossibility of performance, not caused by or a result of a violation of law, shall be an affirmative defense for a public school employer in any action alleging a violation of this subdivision. A public school employer may designate the person to whom a request under this subdivision will be made.(d) An itemized wage statement furnished by a public school employer pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be required to show the classified school employee’s hourly rates or total hours worked if any of the following apply:(1) The employee’s compensation is based on a monthly or yearly salary.(2) The employee is exempt from the payment of minimum wage and overtime under any of the following:(A) The exemption for persons employed in an executive, administrative, or professional capacity provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(B) The exemption for outside salespersons provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(C) The overtime exemption for computer software professionals paid on a salaried basis provided in Section 515.5 of the Labor Code.(D) The exemption for individuals who are the parent, spouse, child, or legally adopted child of the public school employer provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Classified school employee” means a person employed on a full-time or a part-time basis as a classified school employee at a public school employer.(2) “Public school employer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. Section 88169 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 88168, to read:88169. (a) (1) Beginning with the 2026–27 school year, a community college district, at the time of each payment of wages, shall furnish to a classified school employee an accurate itemized statement in writing showing all of the following:(A) Gross wages earned.(B) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the total hours worked by the employee.(C) All deductions, provided that all deductions made on written orders of the employee may be aggregated and shown as one item.(D) Net wages earned.(E) The inclusive dates of the period for which the employee is paid.(F) The name of the employee and only the last four digits of their social security number or an employee identification number other than a social security number.(G) The name and address of the community college district.(H) All applicable hourly rates in effect during the payroll reporting period and the corresponding number of hours worked at each hourly rate by the employee, or the units of full-time equivalent.(I) (i) The total hours of paid and unpaid leave taken during the payroll reporting period and the applicable hourly rates for any paid leave taken.(ii) The leave time described in clause (i) may be reported separately on a supplemental itemized statement so long as it is provided at the same frequency as the statement of wages.(2) The deductions made from the payment of wages shall be recorded in ink or other indelible form, properly dated, showing the month, day, and year, and a copy of the statement and the record of the deductions shall be kept on file by the community college district for at least three years at the community college district or at a central location within the State of California.(3) The itemized statement shall be provided in at least one of the following formats:(A) As a detachable part of the check.(B) As a printed statement issued concurrently with direct deposit, provided it is readily accessible to a classified school employee.(C) As a digital statement made available through a secure employee portal that allows a classified school employee to view, download, and print current and past wage statements at no cost to the employee, provided it is readily accessible to the employee.(b) A community college district that is required by this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section to keep the information required by subdivision (a) shall afford current and former classified school employees the right to inspect or receive a copy of records pertaining to their employment, upon reasonable request to the community college district. The community college district may take reasonable steps to ensure the identity of a current or former classified school employee. If the community college district provides copies of the records, the actual cost of reproduction may be charged to the current or former classified school employee.(c) A community college district who receives a written or oral request to inspect or receive a copy of records pursuant to subdivision (b) pertaining to a current or former classified school employee shall comply with the request as soon as practicable, but no later than 21 calendar days from the date of the request. Impossibility of performance, not caused by or a result of a violation of law, shall be an affirmative defense for a community college district in any action alleging a violation of this subdivision. A community college district may designate the person to whom a request under this subdivision will be made.(d) An itemized wage statement furnished by a community college district pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be required to show the classified school employee’s hourly rates or total hours worked if any of the following apply:(1) The employee’s compensation is based on a monthly or yearly salary.(2) The employee is exempt from the payment of minimum wage and overtime under any of the following:(A) The exemption for persons employed in an executive, administrative, or professional capacity provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(B) The exemption for outside salespersons provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(C) The overtime exemption for computer software professionals paid on a salaried basis provided in Section 515.5 of the Labor Code.(D) The exemption for individuals who are the parent, spouse, child, or legally adopted child of the community college district provided in any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.(e) For purposes of this section, “classified school employee” means a person employed by a community college district for a position that is not an academic position.